Wisconsin, session 2025, AB665.
do enact as follows:AB665,13Section 1. 71.05 (27) of the statutes is created to read:AB665,2,2471.05 (27) Charitable contributions made by non-itemizers. (a) In this 5subsection, “qualifying charitable organization” means an organization described in 1section 170 (b) (1) (A) of the Internal Revenue Code, except for a supporting 2organization described in section 509 (a) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code.AB665,2,93(b) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and subject to the 4limitations in pars. (c) and (d), an individual who does not itemize deductions for 5federal tax purposes may subtract from taxable income the amount of charitable 6contributions made using cash, check, credit card, or similar payment type during 7the taxable year to a qualifying charitable organization. The subtraction under this 8paragraph may not exceed $1,000 for an individual or $2,000 for a married couple 9filing a joint return.AB665,2,1210(c) The subtraction under par. (b) may not be made for a contribution for the 11establishment of a new, or maintenance of an existing, donor advised fund, as 12defined in section 4966 (d) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code.AB665,2,2013(d) With respect to individuals who change their domicile into or from this 14state during the taxable year and nonresident individuals, the subtraction under 15par. (b) shall be limited to the amount determined under par. (b) multiplied by a 16fraction, the numerator of which is the individual’s Wisconsin adjusted gross 17income and the denominator of which is the individual’s federal adjusted gross 18income. For a married couple filing a joint return, the fraction in this paragraph is 19calculated by including the Wisconsin adjusted gross income and federal adjusted 20gross income of both spouses.AB665,2,2121